tables/da-dk-g28.ctb
word Også 147-16
begnum Cå 6-147-16
contraction Cå
word Og 147
word Omkring 1357-134-13
begnum Omk 6-1357-134-13
contraction Omk
word Op 1357
word Or =
word Over 13467

word På 12347

word Ret 123567
word Re 12357-15
word Rigtige 12357-12456
word Rge =
word Rigtigt 12357-2345
begnum Rt 6-12357-2345
contraction Rt
word Rigtig 12357

word Sagde 2347-1456
word Sammen 2347-134
begnum Sm 6-2347-134
contraction Sm
word Samme 2347-146
word Sme =
word Selvfølgelig 2347-1236-124
begnum Svf 6-2347-1236-124
contraction Svf
word Selv 2347-1236
begnum Sv 6-2347-1236
contraction Sv
word Sidste 2347-1356-15
word Sste =
word Sidst 2347-1356
word Sst =
word Sin 2347-1345
begnum Sn 6-2347-1345
contraction Sn
word Sit 2347-2345
begnum St 6-2347-2345
contraction St
word Skal 1234567
word Sk =
word Skulle 1234567-123-15
word Skle =
word Snart 2347-1235
begnum Sr 6-2347-1235
contraction Sr
word Som 2347
word Sådan 167-1
begnum Åa 6-167-1
contraction åa
word Således 167-15
begnum Åe 6-167-15
contraction åe
word Så 167

word Tid 23457-145
begnum Td 6-23457-145
contraction Td
word Tilbage 23457-12
begnum Tb 6-23457-12
contraction Tb
word Til 23457

word Under 123457

lowword Var 367
word Ved 12367
word Ville 12367-123-15
begnum Vle 6-12367-123-15
contraction Vle
word Vil 12367-123
begnum Vl 6-12367-123
contraction Vl
word Været 12367-2345
begnum Vt 6-12367-2345
contraction Vt
word Være 3457

#Part words
nocross den 12346
nocross der 23456
nocross det 2346
nocross de 1456
nocross en 126
nocross er 156
nocross et 346
nocross ge 12456
nocross hvor 34
nocross hv 2456
nocross ig 35
nocross me 146
nocross nd 12345
nocross ne 1246
nocross or 1346
nocross re 12356
nocross sk 123456
nocross st 1356
nocross te 1256
nocross ve 3456

#Part words (capital version)
nocross Den 123467
nocross Der 234567
nocross Det 23467
nocross De 14567
nocross En 1267
nocross Er 1567
nocross Et 3467
nocross Ge 124567
nocross Hvor 347
nocross Hv 24567
nocross Ig 357
nocross Me 1467
nocross Nd 123457
nocross Ne 12467
nocross Or 13467
nocross Re 123567
nocross Sk 1234567
nocross St 13567
nocross Te 12567

#ve special case
nocross Ve 34567

# combinations to handle Danish regression rules
nocross dend 1456-12345
nocross end 15-12345
nocross gend 12456-12345
nocross gen 1245-126
nocross ger 1245-156
nocross get 1245-346
nocross hven 2456-126
nocross hver 2456-156
nocross hvet 2456-346
nocross hve 2456-15
nocross mend 146-12345
nocross men 134-126
nocross mer 134-156
nocross met 134-346
nocross nden 1345-12346
nocross nder 1345-23456
nocross ndet 1345-2346
nocross nend 1246-12345
nocross nen 1345-126
nocross ner 1345-156
nocross net 1345-346
nocross rend 12356-12345
nocross ren 1235-126
nocross rer 1235-156
nocross ret 1235-346
nocross sten 1356-126
nocross ster 1356-156
nocross stet 1356-346
nocross ste 1356-15
nocross tend 1256-12345
nocross ten 2345-126
nocross ter 2345-156
nocross tet 2345-346
nocross vend 3456-12345
nocross ven 1236-126
nocross ver 1236-156
nocross vet 1236-346

# combinations to handle Danish regression rules
nocross Dend 14567-12345
nocross End 157-12345
nocross Gend 124567-12345
nocross Gen 12457-126
nocross Ger 12457-156
nocross Get 12457-346
nocross Hven 24567-126
nocross Hver 24567-156
nocross Hvet 24567-346
nocross Hve 24567-15
nocross Mend 1467-12345
nocross Men 1347-126
nocross Mer 1347-156
nocross Met 1347-346
nocross Nden 13457-12346
nocross Nder 13457-23456
nocross Ndet 13457-2346
nocross Nend 12467-12345
nocross Nen 13457-126
nocross Ner 13457-156
nocross Net 13457-346
nocross Rend 123567-12345
nocross Ren 12357-126
nocross Rer 12357-156
nocross Ret 12357-346
nocross Sten 13567-126
nocross Ster 13567-156
nocross Stet 13567-346
nocross Ste 13567-15
nocross Tend 12567-12345
nocross Ten 23457-126
nocross Ter 23457-156
nocross Tet 23457-346
nocross Vend 34567-12345
nocross Ven 12367-126
nocross Ver 12367-156
nocross Vet 12367-346


#special cases with dropped signs
# which can be both punctuations and contractions.

always fra! 124-1235-1-235
always Fra! 1247-1235-1-235
always !fra 235-124-1235-1
always !Fra 235-1247-1235-1
always !! 235-235
always !!! 235-235-235
always "fra" 2356-124-1235-1-2356
after punctuation always ! 6-235
always 'af 4-1-124

always \s! 0-6-235
prepunc ! 6-235
nofor always ! 6-235
noback context `["!"] @6-235


# Ensure no one-letter word contraction before or after a dash

prfword -af 368-1-124
sufword af- 1-124-368
prfword -at 368-1-2345
sufword at- 1-2345-368
prfword -deres 368-1456-12356-234
sufword deres- 1456-12356-234-368
prfword -du 368-145-136
sufword du- 145-136-368
prfword -efter 368-15-124-2345-156
sufword efter- 15-124-2345-156-368
prfword -for 368-124-1346
sufword for- 124-1346-368
prfword -fra 368-124-1235-1
sufword fra- 124-1235-1-368
prfword -gennem 368-1245-126-1246-134
sufword gennem- 1245-126-1246-134-368
prfword -ham 368-125-1-134
sufword ham- 125-1-134-368
prfword -han 368-125-1-1345
sufword han- 125-1-1345-368
prfword -har 368-125-1-1235
sufword har- 125-1-1235-368
prfword -hun 368-125-136-1345
sufword hun- 125-136-1345-368
prfword -kan 368-13-1-1345
sufword kan- 13-1-1345-368
prfword -lige 368-123-24-12456
sufword lige- 123-24-12456-368
prfword -med 368-146-145
sufword med- 146-145-368
prfword -men 368-134-126
sufword men- 134-126-368
prfword -ned 368-1246-145
sufword ned- 1246-145-368
prfword -når 368-1345-16-1235
sufword når- 1345-16-1235-368
prfword -og 368-135-1245
sufword og- 135-1245-368
prfword -op 368-135-1234
sufword op- 135-1234-368
prfword -over 368-135-1236-156
sufword over- 135-1236-156-368
prfword -på 368-1234-16
sufword på- 1234-16-368
prfword -ret 368-1235-346
sufword ret- 1235-346-368
prfword -rigtig 368-1235-35-2345-35
sufword rigtig- 1235-35-2345-35-368
prfword -skal 368-123456-1-123
sufword skal- 123456-1-123-368
prfword -som 368-234-135-134
sufword som- 234-135-134-368
prfword -så 368-234-16
sufword så- 234-16-368
prfword -til 368-2345-24-123
sufword til- 2345-24-123-368
prfword -under 368-136-1345-23456
sufword under- 136-1345-23456-368
prfword -ved 368-1236-15-145
sufword ved- 1236-15-145-368
prfword -være 368-1236-345-12356
sufword være- 1236-345-12356-368

# *** patches for various Liblouis bugs
# this file will be removed when the bugs are fixed


# *** The following lines are to work around the fact that uplow opcodes can'currently t be used in 8 dots
# if uplow opcodes are used, rules containing cap letters seem to be ignored
# However, without uplow, hyphenation will not work correctly for words with cap letters.
# these lines try to work around wrong hyphenation for words with starting cap.

begword Abst 17-12-1356
word And 17-12345
sufword Aner 17-1345-156
sufword Anet 17-1345-346
sufword Ane 17-1246
begword An 17-1345
sufword Arist 17-1235-24-1356
sufword Besk 127-15-123456
sufword Cast 147-1-1356
begword Cory 147-135-1235-13456
sufword Dansk 1457-1-1345-123456
sufword Derib 234567-24-12
word Deri 234567-24
sufword Dest 14567-1356
sufword Disk 1457-24-123456
sufword Dist 1457-24-1356
sufword Elsk 157-123-123456
sufword Energ 157-1345-156-1245
word Ener 157-1345-156
sufword Ene 157-1246
sufword Eni 157-1345-24
sufword Enige 157-1345-24-12456
sufword Enig 157-1345-35
sufword Enok 157-1345-135-13
begword Enor 157-1345-1346
begword En 1267
sufword Era 157-1235-1
sufword Eri 157-1235-24
sufword Ero 157-1235-135
sufword Esk 157-123456
sufword Est 157-1356
sufword Eta 157-2345-1
sufword Ethv 3467-2456
sufword Eth 157-2345-125
begword Eti 157-2345-24
sufword Eto 157-2345-135
begword Fora 1247-1346-1
sufword Forener 1247-1346-15-1345-156
sufword Forenet 1247-1346-15-1345-346
sufword Forene 1247-1346-15-1246
sufword Forsk 1247-1346-123456
sufword Forø 1247-1346-246
sufword Frenc 1247-1235-126-14
sufword Fre 1247-12356
sufword Gandhi 12457-1-1345-145-125-24
sufword Genan 12457-126-1-1345
sufword Henim 1257-126-24-134
sufword Henover 1257-126-135-1236-156
sufword Heri 1257-156-24
sufword Heste 1257-15-1356-15
sufword Hestene 1257-15-1356-15-1246
sufword Hesten 1257-15-1356-126
sufword Hindren 1257-24-1345-145-1235-126
sufword Hindrer 1257-24-1345-145-1235-156
sufword Hindret 1257-24-1345-145-1235-346
sufword Hindre 1257-24-1345-145-12356
sufword Hver 24567-156
begword Hvor 347
begword Hv 24567
sufword Indimel 247-12345-24-146-123
sufword Indram 247-12345-1235-1-134
word Indre 247-1345-145-12356
sufword Inst 247-1345-1356
sufword Intet 247-1345-2345-346
sufword Konst 137-135-1345-1356
sufword Langst 1237-1-1345-1245-1356
sufword Mask 1347-1-123456
sufword Medej 1467-145-15-245
sufword Meta 1467-2345-1
sufword Mindre 1347-24-1345-145-12356
sufword Mindst 1347-24-12345-1356
sufword Musk 1347-136-123456
sufword Net 13457-346
word Omend 1357-134-15-12345
sufword Opera 1357-1234-15-1235-1
sufword Ora 1357-1235-1
begword Ori 1357-1235-24
sufword Oven 1357-1236-126
begword Over 1357-1236-156
sufword Pisk 12347-24-123456
begword Seren 2347-15-1235-126
begword Sk 1234567
begword St 13567
sufword Super 2347-136-1234-156
begword Søsk 2347-246-123456
begword Tel 12567-123
sufword Træsk 23457-1235-345-123456
begword Tysk 23457-13456-123456
sufword Uden 1367-12346
sufword Udst 1367-145-1356
sufword Undren 1367-1345-145-1235-126
sufword Undrer 1367-1345-145-1235-156
sufword Undret 1367-1345-145-1235-346
sufword Undre 1367-1345-145-12356
sufword Uover 1367-135-1236-156
sufword Venst 12367-126-1356
sufword Vorden 12367-1346-12346
begword Æn 3457-1345


nofor always a 6-1
nofor always b 6-12
nofor always c 6-14
nofor always d 6-145
nofor always e 6-15
nofor always f 6-124
nofor always g 6-1245
nofor always h 6-125
nofor always j 6-245
nofor always k 6-13
nofor always l 6-123
nofor always m 6-134
nofor always n 6-1345
nofor always o 6-135
nofor always p 6-1234
nofor always q 6-12345
nofor always r 6-1235
nofor always s 6-234
nofor always t 6-2345
nofor always u 6-136
nofor always v 6-1236
nofor always w 6-2456
nofor always x 6-1346
nofor always y 6-13456
nofor always z 6-1356
nofor always æ 6-345
nofor always ø 6-246
nofor always å 6-16

nofor always A 6-17
nofor always B 6-127
nofor always C 6-147
nofor always D 6-1457
nofor always E 6-157
nofor always F 6-1247
nofor always G 6-12457
nofor always H 6-1257
nofor always J 6-2457
nofor always K 6-137
nofor always L 6-1237
nofor always M 6-1347
nofor always N 6-13457
nofor always O 6-1357
nofor always P 6-12347
nofor always Q 6-123457
nofor always R 6-12357
nofor always S 6-2347
nofor always T 6-23457
nofor always U 6-1367
nofor always V 6-12367
nofor always W 6-24567
nofor always X 6-13467
nofor always Y 6-134567
nofor always Z 6-13567
nofor always Æ 6-3457
nofor always Ø 6-2467
nofor always Å 6-167

# if a word contraction is followed by a punctuation and another word immediately after,
# The contracted word before the punctuation will back-translate as its components
class wordlimit /,!.:’()?"'\x00ab_\x201d\x0094\x2019\x0092\x00bb
nofor before wordlimit begword af 356
nofor before wordlimit begword aldrig 1-35
nofor before wordlimit begword aig =
nofor before wordlimit begword alle 1-15
nofor before wordlimit begword allerede 1-123-1235
nofor before wordlimit begword alligevel 1-123-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword altid 1-2345-145
nofor before wordlimit begword altså 1-16
nofor before wordlimit begword at 1

nofor before wordlimit begword blevet 12-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword blev 12-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword blive 12-3456
nofor before wordlimit begword bve 12-1236-15
nofor before wordlimit begword bliver 12
